Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Article 2. Floods

§ 935.
Relocation of highway.

When a highway is made impassable, or the width reduced to prevent the free and safe passage, by a landslide or washout, or a bridge is swept away by a flood, the selectboard may change the location of the highway or the bridge and may discontinue any resulting unnecessary parts of the old highway. It may take, damage, or affect such land as may be necessary at the location of the slide or washout for the purpose of re-establishing, repairing, rebuilding, or protecting the highway or bridge and may proceed immediately to build or rebuild the highway or bridge and open the highway or bridge for work and travel.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 936.
Damages; appeal.

The selectboard shall follow the procedures established in section 923 of this title in giving notice, inspecting property, determining need, awarding damages, and satisfying appeals.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.